Indiana, session 2026, HB1331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-30.5-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.182-2009(ss),
SECTION 205, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), the amount of a taxpayer's credit is equal to:
(1) for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2027, fifty
percent (50%) of the amount of the contribution made to the
scholarship granting organization for a school scholarship
program; or
(2) for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026,
seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of the contribution
made to the scholarship granting organization for a school
scholarship program.
(b) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026, the
amount of a taxpayer's credit is equal to ninety percent (90%) of
the amount of the contribution made to the scholarship granting
organization for a school scholarship program, if the taxpayer
commits to providing the scholarship granting organization with
2026 IN 1331—LS 7056/DI 129


a contribution of at least the same amount for at least two (2)
consecutive years.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-30.5-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The total amount of tax
credits awarded under this chapter may not exceed nine million five
hundred thousand dollars ($9,500,000) in the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2016, and ending June 30, 2017.
(b) The total amount of tax credits awarded under this chapter in a
state fiscal year may not exceed the following:
(1) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000)
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2017, and ending June
30, 2018.
(2) Fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2018, and ending June 30, 2019.
(3) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2019, and ending June 30, 2020.
(4) Sixteen million five hundred thousand dollars ($16,500,000)
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2020, and ending June
30, 2021.
(5) Seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars
($17,500,000) for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2021, and
ending June 30, 2022.
(6) Eighteen million five hundred thousand dollars ($18,500,000)
for the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022, and ending June
30, 2023, and for each state fiscal year thereafter. 2027.
(7) Eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) for the state fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2027, and for each state fiscal year
thereafter, as adjusted under subsection (c).
(c) Before October 1, 2028, and before October 1 of each year
thereafter, the department shall adjust the total amount of tax
credits awarded as follows:
(1) If the total amount of tax credits awarded are greater than
or equal to ninety percent (90%) of the amount allowed for
the immediately preceding state fiscal year, the total amount
of tax credits that may be awarded for the state fiscal year in
which the determination is made under this subsection is
equal to:
(A) the total amount of credits allowed for the immediately
preceding state fiscal year (including any adjustment
under this subsection); multiplied by
(B) one and one-tenth (1.1).
2026 IN 1331—LS 7056/DI 129


(2) If the total amount of tax credits awarded are less than
ninety percent (90%) of the amount allowed for the
immediately preceding state fiscal year, the total amount of
tax credits that may be awarded for the state fiscal year in
which the determination is made under this subsection is
equal to the greater of:
(A) eighty million dollars ($80,000,000); or
(B) the total amount of credits allowed to be awarded for
the immediately preceding state fiscal year (including any
adjustment under this subsection).
However, the total amount of credits that may be awarded for a
state fiscal year may not exceed one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000).
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-30.5-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 98, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. The department, on a website used by the
department to provide information to the public, shall provide the
following information:
(1) The application for the credit provided in this chapter.
(2) A timeline for receiving the credit provided in this chapter.
(3) The total amount of credits awarded under this chapter during
the current state fiscal year.
(4) The total amount of credits, as adjusted under section
13(c) of this chapter, that may be awarded under this chapter
for a state fiscal year after June 30, 2028.
SECTION 4. IC 20-51-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 209, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) "Participating school" refers
to a nonpublic school with at least one (1) employee that:
(1) an eligible student is required to pay tuition to attend; and
(2) voluntarily agrees to enroll an eligible student.
(3) is accredited by either the state board or a national or regional
accreditation agency that is recognized by the state board; and
(4) administers the tests under the statewide assessment program
or administers another nationally recognized and norm-referenced
assessment of the school's students.
(b) The term does not include a public school in a school
corporation where the eligible student has legal settlement under
IC 20-26-11.
SECTION 5. IC 20-51-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2013,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. An agreement entered into under section 1 of
2026 IN 1331—LS 7056/DI 129


this chapter between the department and a scholarship granting
organization must require the scholarship granting organization to do
the following:
(1) Provide a receipt to taxpayers for contributions made to the
scholarship granting organization that will be used in a school
scholarship program. The department of state revenue shall
prescribe a standardized form for the receipt issued under this
subdivision. The receipt must indicate:
(A) the value of the contribution and part of the contribution
being designated for use in a school scholarship program; and
(B) whether a taxpayer commits to making contributions
of at least the same amount for at least two (2) consecutive
years to substantiate the credit provided under
IC 6-3.1-30.5-8(b).
(2) Allow a taxpayer to designate a participating school for which
the taxpayer's contribution must be used as scholarships.
(3) Use not more than ten percent (10%) of the total amount of
contributions for administrative costs.
(4) Distribute one hundred percent (100%) of any income earned
on contributions as school scholarships to eligible students.
(5) Conduct criminal background checks on all the scholarship
granting organization's employees and board members and
exclude from employment or governance any individual who
might reasonably pose a risk to the appropriate use of contributed
funds.
(6) Make the reports required by this chapter.
2026 IN 1331—LS 7056/DI 129